Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.60.045

Criminal impersonation in the second degree.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1205-S.SL) ***

(1) A person is guilty of criminal impersonation in the second degree if the person:

(a)(i) Claims to be a law enforcement officer or creates an impression that he or she is a law enforcement officer; and

(ii) Under circumstances not amounting to criminal impersonation in the first degree, does an act with intent to convey the impression that he or she is acting in an official capacity and a reasonable person would believe the person is a law enforcement officer; or

(b) Falsely assumes the identity of a veteran or active duty member of the armed forces of the United States with intent to defraud for the purpose of personal gain or to facilitate any unlawful activity.

(2) Criminal impersonation in the second degree is a gross misdemeanor.

[2004 c 124 s 1; 2004 c 11 s 2; 2003 c 53 s 79.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2004 c 11 s 2 and by 2004 c 124 s 1, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2004 c 124: "This act takes effect July 1, 2004." [2004 c 124 s 2.]

Effective date—2004 c 11: See note following RCW 9A.60.040.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.